Missouri, session 2026, SB1752.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:

There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or
items stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated, for the
period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:

Section 3.005. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For Higher Education Coordination and for grant and scholarship
program administration, provided five percent (5%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 3.150
Personal Service...............................................$5,222,481
Expense and Equipment...................................... 450,816
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................5,673,297

Personal Service.................................................. 65,000
Expense and Equipment...................................... 66,850
From Department of Higher Education Out of State Program Fund
(1420)......................................................... 131,850


SB 1752 2
For workshops and conferences sponsored by the Department of Higher
Education and Workforce Development, and for distribution of
federal funds to higher education institutions, to be paid for on a
cost-recovery basis, and for returning unspent grant funds to the
original grantor organization
From Quality Improvement Revolving Fund (1537)...................... 75,000
Total..............................................................$5,880,147


Section 3.015. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For regulation of proprietary schools as provided in Section 173.600,
RSMo
Personal Service.................................................. $8,643
Expense and Equipment...................................... 65,602
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 74,245

Personal Service................................................. 279,465
Expense and Equipment...................................... 92,522
From Proprietary School Certification Fund (1729). .......................... 371,987

For the initial and ongoing costs to the department associated with the
closure of proprietary schools, provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................... 1,668

Personal Service.................................................. 53,797
Expense and Equipment...................................... 100,000
From Proprietary School Bond Fund (1760)............................ 153,797
Total............................................................... $601,697

Section 3.020. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For indemnifying individuals as a result of improper actions on the part
of proprietary schools as provided in Section 173.612, RSMo
From Proprietary School Bond Fund (1760)................................ $200,000


SB 1752 3
Section 3.025. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For annual membership in the Midwestern Higher Education Compact
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $122,057

Section 3.030. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For receiving and expending donations and federal funds, provided that
the General Assembly shall be notified of the source of any new
funds and the purpose for which they shall be expended, in
writing, prior to the expenditure of said funds and further
provided that no funds shall be used to implement or support the
Common Core Standards
From Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
Federal Fund (1116)............................................. $500,000

Section 3.035. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For receiving and expending donations and funds other than federal
funds, provided that the General Assembly shall be notified of
the source of any new funds and the purpose for which they
shall be expended, in writing, prior to the expenditure of said
funds and further provided that no funds shall be used to
implement or support the Common Core Standards
From State Institutions Gift Trust Fund (1925).............................$1,525,000

Section 3.040. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Academic Scholarship Fund, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$13,802,920
From State Institutions Gift Trust Fund (1925).......................... 3,000,000
Total.............................................................$16,802,920

Section 3.045. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Higher Education Academic Scholarship Program pursuant to
Chapter 173, RSMo

SB 1752 4
From Academic Scholarship Fund (1840)................................$29,076,666

Section 3.050. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Access Missouri Financial Assistance Fund, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$71,871,052
From Missouri Student Grant Program Gift Fund (1272)........................ 50,000
From State Institutions Gift Trust Fund (1925).......................... 3,500,000
Total.............................................................$75,421,052

Section 3.055. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Access Missouri Financial Assistance Program pursuant to
Chapter 173, RSMo
From Access Missouri Financial Assistance Fund (1791)....................$83,960,000

Section 3.060. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the A+
Schools Fund, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$50,687,756
From State Institutions Gift Trust Fund (1925).......................... 3,500,000
Total.............................................................$54,187,756

Section 3.065. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the A+ Schools Program, provided that any institution with
enrolled students receiving such funds shall provide sufficient
data to the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development necessary for the department to submit year-end
information which shall be delivered to the General Assembly
by the department detailing data about the distribution and
utilization of such funds to students, including the number of
students who receive a zero award due to federal and other state
aid

SB 1752 5
From A+ Schools Fund (1955). .......................................$61,900,000

Section 3.070. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Fast
Track Workforce Incentive Grant Fund, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$5,300,000
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291). ................................. 1,000,000
Total..............................................................$6,300,000

Section 3.075. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Fast Track Workforce Incentive Grant Program, provided that
any Fast Track Workforce Incentive Grant toward a scholarship
at a private four-year institution is limited to not more than the
in-state tuition and fees for the University of Missouri-
Columbia, and further provided that any Fast Track Workforce
Incentive Grant toward a scholarship at a private two-year
institution is limited to not more than the in-state tuition, fees,
and charges at a most comparable program at any Missouri two-
year public community college or the State Technical College
of Missouri
From Fast Track Workforce Incentive Grant Fund (1488). ...................$8,000,000

Section 3.080. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Dual
Credit Scholarship Fund, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$4,284,000

Section 3.085. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For providing reimbursements to eligible underserved students pursuant
to Section 173.2505, RSMo, and for providing reimbursement
of dual enrollment or outstanding dual credit costs of eligible
students participating in coursework pursuant to Section
173.2505, RSMo

SB 1752 6
From Dual Credit Scholarship Fund (1541). ..............................$7,000,000

Section 3.090. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For Advanced Placement grants for Access Missouri Financial
Assistance Program and A+ Schools Program recipients
From AP Incentive Grant Fund (1983). ................................... $100,000

Section 3.095. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Public Service Officer or Employee Survivor Grant Program
pursuant to Section 173.260, RSMo, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $273,500

Section 3.100. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Veterans’ Survivors Grant Program pursuant to Section
173.234, RSMo, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $495,000

Section 3.105. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Kids' Chance Scholarship Program pursuant to Chapter 173,
RSMo
From Kids Chance Scholarship Fund (1878)................................. $22,000

Section 3.110. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Minority and Underrepresented Environmental Literacy
Program pursuant to Section 173.240, RSMo, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... $36,964

Section 3.115. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Public Safety Recruitment and Retention Fund

SB 1752 7
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$5,166,698

Section 3.120. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Public Safety Recruitment and Retention Program
From Public Safety Recruitment and Retention Fund (1467). .................$6,000,000

Section 3.125. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Missouri Guaranteed Student Loan Program
From Guaranty Agency Operating Fund (1880). ............................ $640,001

Section 3.130. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For a social work pilot program located in a city with more than
seventy-one thousand but fewer than seventy-nine thousand
inhabitants, provided that program eligibility is limited to
Missouri residents with a minimum of sixty hours toward an
approved bachelors program leading to a degree in social work
or a minimum of six hours towards an approved masters of
social work; and further provided grants shall be awarded up to
the cost of course work tuition and general fees; and further
provided no more than five percent of this subsection can be
used to 11 market the grant program and no more than ten
percent of this subsection can be used to offset institutional
costs for clinical placement and site visits
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $300,000

Section 3.135. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For a statewide program designed to increase collaboration and
workforce opportunities via industry partnership in precision
health and agricultural sciences
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,150,000

Section 3.150. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by

SB 1752 8
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101)............................................$1

Section 3.200. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Division of Workforce Development
For general administration of Workforce Development activities,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service................................................ $737,347
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,946,117
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,683,464

Personal Service...............................................14,315,786
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,284,962
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155)..........................18,600,748

For the Show-Me Heroes Program
From Show Me Heroes Fund (1995).................................. 500,000
Total
$21,784,212

Section 3.205. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For funding for persons with autism through a contract with a Southeast
Missouri organization concentrating on the maximization of
giftedness, workforce transition skills, independent living skills,
and employment support services, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $300,000

Section 3.210. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the Certified Work Ready Community Program, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $100,000

For a Pre-Apprenticeship program within any city not within a county
to assist minorities and women in the preparation for entry into

SB 1752 9
construction contractor sponsored apprenticeship programs by
providing curriculum that teaches core competencies the student
will need before applying for a construction position
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155)............................ 300,000

For a historic local national organization, located within a city with
more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in
more than one county, which enables disadvantaged persons to
obtain self-sufficiency through job training and
entrepreneurship
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155)............................ 100,000

For a non-profit organization located in any city with more than forty
thousand but fewer than fifty-one thousand inhabitants and
partially located in a county with more than seventy thousand
but fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants for a construction,
manufacturing, and healthcare workforce program that operates
statewide and serves historically underrepresented individuals
gain entry into a joint contractor and labor-sponsored registered
apprenticeship by teaching comprehensive core competencies
and providing national and state industry-recognized credentials
that help the individual become employed in a construction,
manufacturing, and healthcare position
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 400,000

For job training and related activities
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155)..........................34,595,665
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949)............................1,000,000

For administration of programs authorized and funded by the United
States Department of Labor, such as Trade Adjustment
Assistance (TAA), and provided that all funds shall be
expended from discrete accounts and that no monies shall be
expended for funding administration of these programs by the
Division of Workforce Development
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155)....................... 2,451,857
Total
$38,947,522


SB 1752 10
Section 3.215. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For promoting, developing, and expanding registered apprenticeships,
including registered apprenticeships and pre-apprenticeships
within industry sectors or occupations
Personal Service................................................ $131,263
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,883,009
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155)..........................$3,014,272

Section 3.220. To the Missouri University of Science and Technology
For phased expansion of Project Lead the Way in ten (10) southern
Missouri counties provided this funding serves as state match
for federal funding, and provides pilot support for Project Lead
the Way in a city with more than one thousand nine hundred but
fewer than two thousand one hundred fifty inhabitants and that
is the county seat of a county with more than twenty-two
thousand but fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and a
county with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than five
thousand but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants in affiliation
with Missouri University of Science and Technology
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $250,000

Section 3.400. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For distribution to community colleges as provided in Section 163.191,
RSMo, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 3.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................$158,476,704
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291). ....................................10,489,991

For distribution to community colleges for the purpose of equity
adjustments
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................10,044,016

For maintenance and repair at community colleges, local matching
funds must be provided on a 50/50 state/local match rate in
order to be eligible for state funds
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................4,396,718


SB 1752 11
For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753)................................ 3,000,000
Total
$186,558,090

Section 3.405. To the State Technical College of Missouri, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$9,065,871
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291). ...................................... 536,217

For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143. 786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753)................................ 32,000
Total..............................................................$9,634,088


Section 3.410. To the University of Central Missouri, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$62,534,817
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291). .....................................6,050,959

For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753)................................ 325,000
Total.............................................................$68,910,776

Section 3.415. To Southeast Missouri State University, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$51,926,716
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291). .....................................4,935,757

For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753)................................ 275,000

SB 1752 12
Total.............................................................$57,137,473

Section 3.420. To Missouri State University, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................$106,840,325
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291). .....................................9,670,119

For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753)................................ 750,000
Total............................................................$117,260,444

Section 3.425. To Lincoln University, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$22,254,925
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291). .....................................1,814,072

For the purpose of funding the 1890 land grant match
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................10,147,715

For the purpose of funding the 1890 institutional support
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,849,965

For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143. 786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753)................................ 200,000
Total.............................................................$37,266,676


Section 3.430. To Truman State University, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$47,055,732
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291). .....................................4,576,165

For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753)................................ 200,000
Total.............................................................$51,831,897

SB 1752 13

Section 3.435. To Northwest Missouri State University, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$35,309,149
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291). .....................................3,342,740

For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753)................................ 250,000
Total.............................................................$38,901,889

Section 3.440. To Missouri Southern State University, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$29,748,281
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291). .....................................2,431,511

For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753)................................ 200,000
Total.............................................................$32,379,792

Section 3.445. To Missouri Western State University, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$25,178,025
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291). .....................................2,394,327

For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753)................................ 325,000
Total.............................................................$27,897,352

Section 3.450. To Harris-Stowe State University, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
3.150
All Expenditures

SB 1752 14
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$11,816,232
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291). .....................................1,148,979

For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753)................................ 200,000
Total.............................................................$13,165,211

Section 3.455. To the University of Missouri
For operation of its various campuses and programs
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................$251,018,644
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291). ....................................46,842,748

For the purpose of funding the federal match requirement and the
statewide operations in the areas of the Agricultural Extension
Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................30,621,747

For the purpose of delivering first professional doctorate degrees in
Medicine, Veterinary Medicine, Dentistry, Pharmacy, and
Optometry
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................112,598,419

For research and development operations of the State's public research
university
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................84,928,741

For the Greenley Research Center for research related to the "Water
Works for Agriculture in Missouri" initiative
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 275,000

For the Fisher Delta Research Center
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,000,000

For the Fisher Delta Research Center for the Rice Breeders Association
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 120,000

For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753)................................ 1,400,000

SB 1752 15
Total............................................................$528,805,299


Section 3.460. To the University of Missouri
For a program designed to increase international collaboration and
economic opportunity located at the University of Missouri –
St. Louis
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,550,000

For matching funds for a federal grant for a center located at the
University of Missouri - St. Louis to assist startups in
developing defense medicine technologies to meet the needs of
U.S. military and security forces
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 600,000

For matching funds for a federal grant for a center located at the
University of Missouri - St. Louis to promote prevention, cure,
and recovery from outbreaks of infectious disease and other
health-related crises
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 250,000
Total..............................................................$2,400,000

Section 3.465. To the University of Missouri
For the Missouri Telehealth Network, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $437,640

For the purpose of creating and implementing up to eight (8) Extension
for Community Healthcare Outcomes Programs. Four (4) of the
programs shall focus on Hepatitis, Diabetes, Chronic Pain
Management, and Childhood Asthma
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 1,500,000
Total..............................................................$1,937,640


Section 3.470. To the University of Missouri
For a program of research into spinal cord injuries
All Expenditures
From Spinal Cord Injury Fund (1578)..............................$1,500,000


SB 1752 16

Section 3.475. To the University of Missouri
For the treatment of renal disease in a statewide program, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...............................$1,750,000


Section 3.480. To the University of Missouri
For the State Historical Society, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 3.150
All Expenditures
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...............................$4,682,672


Section 3.485. To the Board of Curators of the University of Missouri
For use by the University of Missouri pursuant to Sections 172.610
through 172.720, RSMo
From State Seminary Moneys Fund (1623)................................. $275,000
(cid:252)